Tennessee, session 114, HB1956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3501(1), is amended by
deleting "stage 4 advanced metastatic cancer, metastatic blood cancer, or treatment of such
cancers" and substituting "cancer or the treatment of cancer".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3501, is amended by deleting
subdivision (10).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3502(h)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) Notwithstanding this section, and except as provided in subdivision (h)(3), a
health benefit plan that provides coverage for cancer and associated conditions shall not
require use of a step therapy protocol before the health benefit plan provides coverage
of an approved prescription drug to an enrollee who has received a diagnosis of cancer.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3502(h)(2), is amended by
deleting "stage 4 advanced metastatic cancer or metastatic blood".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3502(h)(5), is amended by
deleting "stage 4 advanced metastatic cancer and metastatic blood".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3502(h)(6), is amended by
deleting "stage 4 advanced metastatic cancer or metastatic blood" in subdivision (B) and (C).
HB1956
011455
- 1 -

SECTION 7. The commissioner of commerce and insurance and the commissioner of
health may promulgate rules to effectuate this act. The rules must be promulgated in
accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 8. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to policies or agreements entered into, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
- 2 - 011455